Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1719.04
Collection of taxes, personal; false return; damages.

For knowingly making a false return, the officer shall be liable for double the amount of taxes, with interest and costs, to be recovered in the name of the county.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 155, p. 444;

Laws 1911, c. 106, § 1, p. 385;

R.S.1913, § 6484;

C.S.1922, § 6011;

C.S.1929, § 77-1916;

Laws 1943, c. 181, § 2, p. 628;

R.S.1943, § 77-1719;

Laws 1947, c. 259, § 2(5), p. 848.